District of Columbia statutes.
42-1902.01

Creation of condominiums; recordation of instruments; plats; contiguity of units.

No condominium shall come into existence except by the recordation of condominium instruments pursuant to the provisions of this chapter. No condominium instruments shall be recorded unless all units located or to be located on any portion of the submitted land, other than within the boundaries of any convertible lands, are depicted on plats and plans that comply with the provisions of subsections (a) and (b) of § 42-1902.14. The foreclosure of any mortgage, deed of trust or other lien shall not be deemed, ex proprio vigore, to terminate the condominium.

Mar. 29, 1977, D.C. Law 1-89, title II, § 201, 23 DCR 9532b
Mar. 8, 1991, D.C. Law 8-233, § 2(h), 38 DCR 261
Bylaws and declaration copies for purchasers, see § 42-1904.10.
This section is referenced in § 42-1904.10.
1981 Ed., § 45-1811.
1973 Ed., § 5-1211.